Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202659-1608.01
Enforcement of act; venue; jury trial.

(1) In the enforcement of the Consumer Protection Act, the Attorney General may bring an action in the name of the state in the district court of:

(a) The county in which the alleged violator resides or has his or her principal place of business;

(b) A county in which the Attorney General brings a related claim arising under the Uniform Deceptive Trade Practices Act; or

(c) Lancaster County.

(2) The Attorney General or defendant may demand that any claim under the Consumer Protection Act be tried by a jury.

Laws 1983, LB 32, § 6;

Laws 2002, LB 1278, § 24;

Laws 2024, LB934, § 1.

Uniform Deceptive Trade Practices Act, see section 87-306.